Utah statutes.
9-7-206.   State Library Donation Fund -- Deposits and fees.

(1)  There is created a restricted special revenue fund entitled the "State Library Donation Fund" to receive bequests, gifts, and endowments of money.

(2)  Any interest or proceeds realized from the use or disposition of property received by the division or interest on the fund itself shall be deposited in the State Library Donation Fund and used by the State Library Division for the purposes specified by the donor.

(3)  All fees paid to the library and collections made due to damaged books or through sale or exchange of books and other materials shall be deposited in the General Fund as dedicated credits for use by the State Library Division.



Amended by Chapter 256, 2002 General Session

